California, session 20252026, AB2109.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6046.9 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:6046.9. On January 1, 2029, the examining committee shall replace the California bar examination with the National Conference of Bar Examiners’ Uniform Bar Examination created by the National Conference of Bar Examiners. or any successor or replacement of that exam.